California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(d) After the exhaustion of the review procedure provided in this section, the director, or his or her representative, may file a certified copy of a final decision of the director that directs the payment of a civil penalty and, if applicable, any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. No fees shall be charged by the clerk of the superior court for the performance of any official service required in connection with the entry of judgment pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 17.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 8698.6.)
-------------------------------------------

8698.4.

Pursuant to Section 15204.6 of the Food and Agricultural Code, a county agricultural commissioner may require full payment of any delinquent fees due to that county pursuant to Section 8698.1 as a condition to registering a structural pest control licensee to operate a structural pest control business in that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 596, Sec. 4.   (AB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 8698.6.)
-------------------------------------------

8698.5.

Funds collected pursuant to this chapter shall be paid to the county and used for the sole purpose of funding enforcement and training activities directly related to the structural fumigation program created pursuant to Section 8698. The fees collected under this chapter shall be in addition to, and shall not be used to supplant, other funds provided to the county agricultural commissioner pursuant to Section 12844 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 8698.6.)
-------------------------------------------

8698.6.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 82, Sec. 1.   (AB 307)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 14.5, commencing with Section 8698.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Land Surveyors [8700. - 8805.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [8700. - 8708.]

8700.

This chapter may be cited as the Professional Land Surveyors’ Act. Whenever reference is made to the Land Surveyors’ Act by any statute, it shall be construed as referring to the Professional Land Surveyors’ Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 582, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8701.

“Professional land surveyor” refers to one who practices or offers to practice land surveying. Whenever reference is made to a land surveyor by any statute, it shall be construed as referring to a professional land surveyor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 582, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8702.

“Director” refers to the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

8703.

The phrase “responsible charge of work” means the independent control and direction, by the use of initiative, skill, and independent judgment, of the observations, measurements, and descriptions involved in land surveying work. The phrase does not refer to the concept of financial liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 229, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.

Any person practices land surveying when he professes to be a land surveyor or is in responsible charge of land surveying work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

8705.

A subordinate is any person directly supervised by a licensed land surveyor or registered civil engineer and who assists a licensed land surveyor or registered civil engineer in the practice of land surveying without assuming responsible charge of work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 834.)
-------------------------------------------

8706.

“Board” refers to the Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 696, Sec. 5.   (AB 1431)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

8707.

“Executive officer” refers to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 79.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

8708.

In order to safeguard property and public welfare, no person shall practice land surveying unless appropriately licensed or specifically exempted from licensure under this chapter, and only persons licensed under this chapter shall be entitled to take and use the titles “licensed land surveyor,” “professional land surveyor,” or “land surveyor,” or any combination of these words, phrases, or abbreviations thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1006, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [8710. - 8715.4.]

8710.

(a) The Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists is vested with power to administer the provisions and requirements of this chapter, and may make and enforce rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary to carry out its provisions.

(b) The board may adopt rules and regulations of professional conduct that are not inconsistent with state and federal law. The rules and regulations may include definitions of incompetence and negligence. Every person who holds a license or certificate issued by the board pursuant to this chapter, or a license or certificate issued to a civil engineer pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700), shall be governed by these rules and regulations.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 15.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8710.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 29.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8711.

The executive officer of the board shall keep a complete record of all applications for license and the board’s action thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 80.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

8712.

The board shall compile and maintain, or may have compiled and maintained on its behalf, a register of all licensed land surveyors that includes the following information for each licensee:

(a) Name.

(b) Address of record.

(c) Type of branch license.

(d) License number.

(e) The date the license was issued.

(f) The date the license will expire.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8713.

The department may employ such clerical assistance under civil service regulations as may be necessary properly to carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

8714.

The board shall establish relations with bodies that regulate the practice of professional land surveying, or closely related professions, or that register or license professional land surveyors in other states, and may establish relations with those bodies in other countries, for the purposes of working toward uniformly high professional standards and mutual recognition of registration and licensure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 432, Sec. 30.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8715.

The board may establish licensed land surveyor technical advisory committees to advise and assist the board with respect to the following:

(1) The review and verification of applications for licensure.

(2) The evaluation and investigation of potential violations of this chapter. 

(3) The amendment, repeal, adoption, or revision of board rules, regulations, policies, or procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 229, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

8715.1.

Each member of each technical advisory committee shall be appointed by the board and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. Each committee shall be composed of no more than five members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 229, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

8715.2.

Each member of each technical advisory committee shall be licensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 229, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

8715.3.

All members of each technical advisory committee shall serve without compensation but shall receive per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 229, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

8715.4.

Each member of each technical advisory committee shall be granted the same immunity as is granted to a public employee pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 229, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.3. Land Surveyors Review Committees [8720. - 8720.6.]

8720.

The board, when it deems necessary, may establish land surveyors review committees to hear all matters assigned by the board, including, but not limited to, any contested case which is assigned by the board. Each committee shall exist so long as the board deems that it is necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

8720.1.

Each review committee shall consist of no fewer than three licensed land surveyors appointed by the board. Each member of a committee shall have the same qualifications and shall be subject to the same rules and regulations as if he were a member of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

8720.2.

Each member of a committee shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

8720.3.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, all hearings which are conducted by a committee shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

If a contested case is heard by a committee, the hearing officer who presided at the hearing shall be present during the committee’s consideration of the case and, if requested, shall assist and advise the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8720.4.

At the conclusion of any hearing which is conducted by a committee, the committee shall prepare a proposed decision, in such form that it may be adopted by the board as the decision in the case, and shall transmit it to the board. The proposed decision shall be subject to the same procedure as the proposed decision of a hearing officer under subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 11517 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

8720.5.

The board may adopt, amend, or repeal, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1013, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8720.6.

Each member of a land surveyors review committee or other board-appointed committee and any board-appointed representative of the board shall be granted the same immunity as is granted to a public employee pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 229, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of the Chapter [8725. - 8731.]

8725.

Any person practicing, or offering to practice, land surveying in this state shall submit evidence that he or she is qualified to practice and shall be licensed under this chapter.

It is unlawful for any person to practice, offer to practice, or represent himself or herself, as a land surveyor in this state, or to set, reset, replace, or remove any survey monument on land in which he or she has no legal interest, unless he or she has been licensed or specifically exempted from licensing under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 805, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8725.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the licensure requirements that are imposed upon private sector professional land surveyors and land surveying partnerships, firms, or corporations shall be imposed upon the state and any city, county, city and county, district, and special district that shall adhere to those requirements. Therefore, for the purposes of Section 8725 and this chapter, at least one person authorized to practice land surveying shall be designated the person in responsible charge of professional land surveying work practiced in any department or agency of the state, city, county, city and county, district, or special district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 400, Sec. 15.   (SB 1467)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8726.

(a) A person, including any person employed by the state or by a city, county, or city and county within the state, practices land surveying within the meaning of this chapter who, either in a public or private capacity, does or offers to do any one or more of the following:

(1) Locates, relocates, establishes, reestablishes, or retraces the alignment or elevation for any of the fixed works embraced within the practice of civil engineering, as described in Section 6731.

(2) Determines the configuration or contour of the earth’s surface, or the position of fixed objects above, on, or below the surface of the earth by applying the principles of mathematics or
 photogrammetry.

(3) Locates, relocates, establishes, reestablishes, or retraces any property line or boundary of any parcel of land, right-of-way, easement, or alignment of those lines or boundaries.

(4) Makes any survey for the subdivision or resubdivision of any tract of land. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term “subdivision” or “resubdivision” shall be defined to include, but not be limited to, the definition in the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code) or the Subdivided Lands Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 of Division 4 of this code).

(5) By the use of the principles of land surveying determines the position for any monument or reference point that marks a property line, boundary, or corner, or sets, resets, or
 replaces any monument or reference point.

(6) Geodetic surveying or cadastral surveying. As used in this chapter:

(A) Geodetic surveying means performing surveys, in which account is taken of the figure and size of the earth to determine or predetermine the horizontal or vertical positions of fixed objects thereon or related thereto, geodetic control points, monuments, or stations for use in the practice of land surveying or for stating the position of fixed objects, geodetic control points, monuments, or stations by California Coordinate System coordinates.

(B) Cadastral surveying means performing a survey that creates, marks, defines, retraces, or reestablishes the boundaries and subdivisions of the public land survey system of the United States.

(7) Determines the information shown or to be shown on any map or document prepared or furnished in connection with any one or more of the functions described in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive.

(8) Indicates, in any capacity or in any manner, by the use of the title “land surveyor” or by any other title or by any other representation that they practice or offer to practice land surveying in any of its branches.

(9) Procures or offers to procure land surveying work for themselves or others.

(10) Manages, or conducts as manager, proprietor, or agent, any place of business from which land surveying work is solicited, performed, or practiced.

(11) Coordinates the work of professional, technical, or special consultants in connection with the
 activities authorized by this chapter.

(12) Determines the information shown or to be shown within the description of any deed, trust deed, or other title document prepared for the purpose of describing the limit of real property in connection with any one or more of the functions described in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive.

(13) Creates, prepares, or modifies electronic or computerized data in the performance of the activities described in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (11), and (12).

(14) Renders a statement regarding the accuracy of maps or measured survey data.

(b) Any department or agency of the state or any city, county, or city and county that has an unregistered person in responsible charge of land surveying work on January 1, 1986,
 shall be exempt from the requirement that the person be licensed as a land surveyor until the person currently in responsible charge is replaced.

(c) The review, approval, or examination by a governmental entity of documents prepared or performed pursuant to this section shall be done by, or under the direct supervision of, a person authorized to practice land surveying.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 106, Sec. 1.   (SB 414)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8726.1.

Any licensed land surveyor may offer to practice, procure, and offer to procure civil engineering work incidental to his or her land surveying practice, even though he or she is not authorized to perform such work, provided all such civil engineering work is performed by or under the direction of a registered civil engineer. Further, any licensed land surveyor
 may manage or conduct as manager, proprietor, or agent, a land surveying practice which offers to practice, procure, and offers to procure, such incidental civil engineering work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 760, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8726.2.

A licensed land surveyor may also perform land planning in connection with the land surveying activities authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 817, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8727.

Surveys made exclusively for geological purposes performed by a person authorized to practice geology under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 7800) or exclusively for landscaping purposes performed by a person authorized to practice landscape architecture pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5615), that do not involve the determination of any property line do not constitute surveying within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 630, Sec. 13.   (AB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8728.

Surveys authorized under this chapter do not include the design, either in whole or in part, of any structure or fixed works embraced within the practice of civil engineering.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 834.)
-------------------------------------------

8729.

(a) This chapter does not prohibit one or more licensed land surveyors or civil engineers licensed in this state before 1982 (hereinafter called civil engineers) from practicing or offering to practice, within the scope of their licensure, land surveying as a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability partnership, firm, or corporation (hereinafter called business), if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) A land surveyor or civil engineer currently licensed in the state is an owner, partner, or officer in charge of the land surveying practice of the business.

(2) All land surveying services are performed by or under the responsible charge of a land surveyor or civil engineer.

(3) If the business name of a California land surveying business contains the name of a person, then that person shall be licensed by the board as a land surveyor or licensed by the board in any year as a civil engineer. Any offer, promotion, or advertisement by the business that contains the name of any individual in the business, other than by use of the name of the individual in the business name, shall clearly and specifically designate the license discipline of each individual named.

(b) An out-of-state business with a branch office in this state shall meet the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (h) and shall have an owner, partner, or officer who is in charge of the land surveying work in this state, who is licensed in this state, and who is physically present at the branch office in this state on a regular basis. However, the name of the business may contain the name of a
 person not licensed in this state, if that person is appropriately licensed or registered in another state. Any offer, promotion, or advertisement that contains the name of any individual in the business, other than by use of the name of the individual in the business name, shall clearly and specifically designate the license or registration discipline of each individual named.

(c) The business name of a California land surveying business may be a fictitious name. However, if the fictitious name includes the names of any person, the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be met.

(d) A person not licensed under this chapter or licensed as a civil engineer in this state before 1982 may also be a partner or an officer of a land surveying business if the conditions of subdivision (a) are satisfied. This section does not permit a person who is not licensed under this
 chapter or licensed as a civil engineer in this state before 1982 to be the sole owner or officer of a land surveying business, unless otherwise exempt under this chapter.

(e) This section shall not prevent the use of the name of any business engaged in rendering land surveying services, including the use by any lawful successor or survivor, that lawfully was in existence on June 1, 1941. However, the business is subject to the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(f) A business engaged in rendering land surveying services may use in its name the name of a deceased or retired person if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person’s name had been used in the name of the business, or a predecessor in interest of the business, before the death or retirement of the person.

(2) The person shall have been an owner, partner, or officer of the business, or an owner, partner, or officer of the predecessor in interest of the business.

(3) The person shall have been licensed as a land surveyor or a civil engineer by the board, if operating a place of business or practice in this state, or by an applicable state board in the event no place of business existed in this state.

(4) The person, if retired, has consented to the use of the name and does not permit the use of the name in the title of another land surveying business in this state during the period of that consent, except that a retired person may use their name as the name of a new or purchased business, if that business is not identical in every respect to that person’s name as used in the former business.

(5) The business shall be subject to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(g) This section does not affect Sections 6731.2 and 8726.1.

(h) (1) A current organization record form shall be filed with the board for all businesses engaged in rendering professional land surveying services.

(2) The filing of the organization record form described in paragraph (1) shall be accompanied by documentary evidence that demonstrates compliance with the provisions described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 302, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 16.5.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 17.5 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 588.)
-------------------------------------------

8729.

(a) This chapter does not prohibit one or more licensed land surveyors or civil engineers licensed in this state before 1982 (hereinafter called civil engineers) from practicing or offering to practice within the scope of their licensure, land surveying as a sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, or corporation (hereinafter called business), if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) A land surveyor or civil engineer currently licensed in the state is an owner, partner, or officer in charge of the land surveying practice of the business.

(2) All land surveying services are performed by or under the responsible charge of a land surveyor or civil engineer.

(3) If the business name of a California land surveying business contains the name of a person, then that person shall be licensed by the board as a land surveyor or licensed by the board in any year as a civil engineer. Any offer, promotion, or advertisement by the business that contains the name of any individual in the business, other than by use of the name of the individual in the business name, shall clearly and specifically designate the license discipline of each individual named.

(b) An out-of-state business with a branch office in this state shall meet the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (h) and shall have an owner, partner, or officer who is in charge of the land surveying work in this state, who is licensed in this state, and who is physically present at the branch office in this state on a regular basis. However, the name of the business may contain the name of a
 person not licensed in this state, if that person is appropriately licensed or registered in another state. Any offer, promotion, or advertisement that contains the name of any individual in the business, other than by use of the name of the individual in the business name, shall clearly and specifically designate the license or registration discipline of each individual named.

(c) The business name of a California land surveying business may be a fictitious name. However, if the fictitious name includes the names of any person, the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be met.

(d) A person not licensed under this chapter or licensed as a civil engineer in this state before 1982 may also be a partner or an officer of a land surveying business if the conditions of subdivision (a) are satisfied. This section does not permit a person who is not licensed under this
 chapter or licensed as a civil engineer in this state before 1982 to be the sole owner or officer of a land surveying business, unless otherwise exempt under this chapter.

(e) This section shall not prevent the use of the name of any business engaged in rendering land surveying services, including the use by any lawful successor or survivor, that lawfully was in existence on June 1, 1941. However, the business is subject to the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(f) A business engaged in rendering land surveying services may use in its name the name of a deceased or retired person if the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person’s name had been used in the name of the business, or a predecessor in interest of the business, before the death or retirement of the person.

(2) The person shall have been an owner, partner, or officer of the business, or an owner, partner, or officer of the predecessor in interest of the business.

(3) The person shall have been licensed as a land surveyor or a civil engineer by the board, if operating a place of business or practice in this state, or by an applicable state board in the event no place of business existed in this state.

(4) The person, if retired, has consented to the use of the name and does not permit the use of the name in the title of another land surveying business in this state during the period of that consent, except that a retired person may use their name as the name of a new or purchased business, if that business is not identical in every respect to that person’s name as used in the former business.

(5) The business shall be subject to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(g) This section does not affect Sections 6731.2 and 8726.1.

(h) (1) A current organization record form shall be filed with the board for all businesses engaged in rendering professional land surveying services.

(2) The filing of the organization record form described in paragraph (1) shall be accompanied by documentary evidence that demonstrates compliance with the provisions described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2034.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 302, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 17.5.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8730.

The following persons are not required to be licensed under this chapter:

(a) Officers and employees of the United States of America, practicing solely as those officers or employees, except when surveying the exterior boundaries of federal lands in this state.

(b) Insofar as he or she acts in the following capacity:

(1) Any state, county, city, city and county, or district
 employee directly responsible to a licensed land surveyor or registered civil engineer.

(2) Any subordinate to a land surveyor or civil engineer licensed or registered as required by the laws of this state insofar as he or she acts as a subordinate.

(c) Any officer or employee of an electric, gas, or telephone corporation, as defined in Sections 218, 222, and 234, respectively, of the Public Utilities Code, with annual revenues of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) or more, whenever he or she prepares a legal description of an easement for utility distribution lines and service facilities, provided the following conditions are met:

(1) Each description identifies the corporation that prepared the description and states that it was prepared pursuant to this exemption.

(2) Each corporation has in its employ, or on contract, an individual authorized to practice land surveying who shall be responsible for establishing criteria for determining the qualifications of technical specialists preparing those legal descriptions, specifying the format and information to be shown on maps or documents containing those descriptions, and capable of answering questions regarding the preparation of those descriptions.

(d) Any state, county, city, or city and county public safety employee investigating any crime or infraction for the purpose of determining or prosecuting a crime or infraction. This exemption shall not permit a public safety employee to offer or perform land surveying as defined in Section 8726 for any purpose other than determining or prosecuting a crime or infraction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8731.

A licensed civil engineer and a civil engineer exempt from licensure under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) are exempt from licensing under this chapter and may engage in the practice of land surveying with the same rights and privileges and the same duties and responsibilities as a licensed land surveyor, provided that for civil engineers who become licensed after January 1, 1982, they shall obtain a license as a land surveyor under the provisions of this chapter, before practicing land surveying as defined in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 22.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Issuance of License [8740. - 8753.]

8740.

(a) An application for a certificate as a land surveyor-in-training or for a license as a land surveyor shall be made to the board on the form prescribed by it, with all statements therein made under oath, and shall be accompanied by the fee fixed by this chapter.

(b) The board may authorize an organization specified by the board pursuant to Section 8745 to receive directly from applicants payment of the examination fees charged by that organization as payment for examination materials and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 23.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8741.

(a) An applicant for certification as a land surveyor-in-training shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(2) Successfully pass the first division of the examination.

(3) Satisfactorily complete two years or more of postsecondary education in land surveying, two years or more of experience in land surveying, or a combination of postsecondary education and experience in land surveying.

(b) The board need not verify the applicant’s
 eligibility for certification as a land surveyor-in-training other than to require the applicant to sign a statement of eligibility on the application form.

(c) The board may prescribe by regulation reasonable educational or experience requirements for an applicant to meet the requirements in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(d) An applicant for licensure as a professional land surveyor shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(2) Furnish evidence that he or she meets the requirements of Section 8742.

(3) Successfully passed the second division of the examination.

(4) Be certified as a land surveyor-in-training in this state, be certified as a land surveyor-in-training or surveyor intern in another state or territory of the United States, or be exempt therefrom. An applicant licensed by the board as a civil engineer is exempt from the requirement of this paragraph.

(5) Be thoroughly familiar with (A) the procedure and rules governing the survey of public lands as set forth in Manual of Surveying Instructions (2009), published by the federal Bureau of Land Management, and (B) the principles of real property relating to boundaries and conveyancing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 24.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8741.1.

(a) The first division of the examination shall test the applicant’s fundamental knowledge of surveying, mathematics, and basic science.

(b) The second division of the examination shall test the applicant’s ability to apply his or her knowledge and experience and to assume responsible charge in the professional practice of land surveying.

The second division of the examination shall include an examination that incorporates a national examination for land surveying by a nationally recognized entity approved by the board and a supplemental California specific examination. The California specific examination shall include, as a separate part,
 an examination to test the applicant’s knowledge of the provisions of this chapter and the board’s rules and regulations regulating the practice of professional land surveying in this state.

(c) The board may by rule provide a waiver of the first division of the examination for applicants whose education and experience qualifications substantially exceed the requirements of Section 8742.

(d) The board may by rule provide for a waiver of the second division of the examination and the assignment to a special examination for those applicants whose educational qualifications are equal to, and whose experience qualifications substantially exceed, those qualifications established under subdivision (c). The special examination may be either written or oral, or a combination of both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 25.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8742.

(a) The educational qualifications and experience in land surveying, which an applicant for a license as a land surveyor shall possess, shall not be less than one of the following prescribed criteria:

(1) Graduation from a four-year curriculum with an emphasis in land surveying approved by the board or accredited by a national or regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Office of Education at a postsecondary educational institution and two years of actual broad based progressive experience in land surveying, including one year of responsible field training and one year of responsible office training, satisfactory to the board.

(2) Actual broad based progressive experience in land surveying for at least six years, including one year of responsible field training and one year of responsible office training, satisfactory to the board.

(3) Licensure as a civil engineer with two years of actual broad based progressive experience in land surveying satisfactory to the board.

(b) With respect to an applicant for a license as a land surveyor, the board shall count one year of postsecondary education in land surveying as one year of experience in land surveying up to a maximum of four years, provided the applicant has graduated from the course in land surveying and the curriculum in land surveying is approved by the board or is accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized for the purpose by the United States Office of Education.
 Each year of study in an approved or an accredited course in land surveying without graduation shall be counted the same as one-half year of experience.

Each applicant claiming equivalent credit for education may be required to produce a complete transcript of all college level courses completed.

Until January 1, 2000, the board may, at its discretion, confer credit as experience in land surveying, not in excess of two years, for successfully passing the first division of the examination prescribed in Section 8741.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 26.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

8743.
